Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6408
Refrigerant; state building code; regulation; restrictions.

No provision of the state building code may prohibit or otherwise limit the use of a refrigerant designated as acceptable for use pursuant to and in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 7671k, as such section existed on January 1, 2023, as long as any equipment containing such refrigerant is listed and installed in accordance with safety standards and use conditions imposed pursuant to such designation.

Laws 2023, LB531, § 27.